Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB9.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 7A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 8 of this Act:
(1) "Board" means the Medicaid Oversight and Advisory Board;
(2) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(3) "Commission" means the Legislative Research Commission;
(4) "Department" means the Department for Medicaid Services; and
(5) "Medicaid program" means the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program
established in KRS 205.510 to 205.630 and the Kentucky Children's Health
Insurance Program established in KRS 205.6483.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 7A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Medicaid Oversight and Advisory Board of the Kentucky General Assembly is
hereby established. The purpose of the board is to optimize delivery of health services
for continually improving health outcomes and doing so in a cost efficient and effective
manner. The board shall review, analyze, study, evaluate, provide legislative oversight,
and make recommendations to the General Assembly regarding any aspect of the
Kentucky Medicaid program, including but not limited to benefits and coverage
policies, access to services and network adequacy, health outcomes and equity,
reimbursement rates, payment methodologies, delivery system models, financing and
funding, and administrative regulations.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 7A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall be composed of the following members:
Page 1 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
(a) Ten (10) legislative members, as follows:
1. Four (4) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, each of whom shall serve
while a member of the House for the term for which he or she has
been elected, one (1) of whom shall be the chair or vice chair of the
House Standing Committee on Health Services, and one (1) of whom
shall be the chair or vice chair of the House Standing Committee on
Families and Children;
2. One (1) member of the House of Representatives appointed by the
Minority Floor Leader of the House of Representatives, who shall
serve while a member of the House for the term for which he or she
has been elected;
3. Four (4) members of the Senate appointed by the President of the
Senate, each of whom shall serve while a member of the Senate for the
term for which he or she has been elected, one (1) of whom shall be
the chair or vice chair of the Senate Standing Committee on Health
Services, and one (1) of whom shall be the chair or vice chair of the
Senate Standing Committee on Families and Children; and
4. One (1) member of the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor Leader
of the Senate, who shall serve while a member of the Senate for the
term for which he or she has been elected;
(b) Eleven (11) nonlegislative, nonvoting members, as follows:
1. The commissioner of the department or his or her designee;
2. The chief medical officer of the Commonwealth or his or her
designee;
3. The chair of the Advisory Council for Medical Assistance established
in KRS 205.540 or his or her designee;
Page 2 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
4. The state budget director or his or her designee;
5. The Auditor of Public Accounts or his or her designee;
6. The executive director of the Kentucky Association of Health Plans, or
its successor organization, or his or her designee;
7. The director of the Center of Excellence in Rural Health established
in KRS 164.937 or his or her designee;
8. Two (2) members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, of which:
a. One (1) shall have significant Medicaid-specific experience in
healthcare administration, financing, policy, or research; and
b. One (1) shall be a licensed healthcare provider who is a
participating Medicaid provider and who serves on one (1) of the
technical advisory committees to the Advisory Council for
Medical Assistance established in KRS 205.590;
9. Two (2) members appointed by the President of the Senate, of which:
a. One (1) shall have significant Medicaid-specific experience in
healthcare administration, financing, policy, or research; and
b. One (1) shall be a licensed healthcare provider who is a
participating Medicaid provider and who serves on one (1) of the
technical advisory committees to the Advisory Council for
Medical Assistance established in KRS 205.590; and
(c) Two (2) nonvoting ex officio members, as follows:
1. The chair of the House Standing Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue; and
2. The chair of the Senate Standing Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue.
(2) (a) Of the members appointed pursuant to subsection (1)(a)1. of this section,
Page 3 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate one (1) as co-
chair of the board.
(b) Of the members appointed pursuant to subsection(1)(a)3. of this section, the
President of the Senate shall designate one (1) as co-chair of the board.
(c) In order to be eligible for appointment under subsection (1)(b) 8. and 9. of
this section an individual shall not:
1. Be a member of the General Assembly;
2. Be employed by a state agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; or
3. Receive contractual compensation for services rendered to a state
agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that would conflict with his
or her service on the board.
(d) For the purpose of appointing members described in subsection (1)(b)8.a
and 9.a. of this section, "significant Medicaid-specific experience in
healthcare administration, financing, policy, or research" means:
1. Experience in administering the Kentucky Medical Assistance
Program;
2. A hospital administrator with relevant experience in Medicaid billing
or regulatory compliance;
3. An attorney licensed to practice law in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky with relevant experience in healthcare law;
4. A consumer or patient advocate with relevant experience in the area of
Medicaid policy; or
5. A current or former university professor whose primary area of
emphasis is healthcare economics or financing, health equity,
healthcare disparities, or Medicaid policy.
(e) Individuals appointed to the board under subsection (1)(b) 8. and 9. of this
section shall:
Page 4 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
1. Serve for a term of two (2) years; and
2. Not serve more than one (1) consecutive term after which time he or
she may not be reappointed to the board for a period of at least two (2)
years.
(f) If an individual appointed to the board pursuant to subsection (1)(b)8.b. or
9.b. of this section ceases to participate in the Medicaid program or ceases
to serve on a technical advisory committee to the Advisory Council for
Medical Assistance established in KRS 205.590, he or she may continue to
serve on the board until his or her replacement has been appointed.
(3) (a) Any vacancy which may occur in the membership of the board shall be
filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
(b) A member of the board whose term has expired may continue to serve until
such time as his or her replacement has been appointed.
(4) Members of the board shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties on the board.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 7A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall meet at least six (6) times during each calendar year.
(2) The co-chairs of the board shall have joint responsibilities for board meeting
agendas and presiding at board meetings.
(3) (a) On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set a
meeting date.
(b) A scheduled meeting may be canceled by agreement of both co-chairs.
(4) A majority of the entire voting membership of the board shall constitute a
quorum, and all actions of the board shall be by vote of a majority of its entire
voting membership.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 7A IS CREATED TO
Page 5 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The board, consistent with its purpose as established in Section 2 of this Act, shall have
the authority to:
(1) Require any of the following entities to provide any and all information necessary
to carry out the board's duties, including any contracts entered into by the
department, the cabinet, or any other state agency related to the administration of
any aspect of the Medicaid program or the delivery of Medicaid benefits or
services:
(a) The cabinet;
(b) The department;
(c) Any other state agency;
(d) Any Medicaid managed care organization with whom the department has
contracted for the delivery of Medicaid services;
(e) The state pharmacy benefit manager contracted by the department pursuant
to KRS 205.5512; and
(f) Any other entity contracted by a state agency to administer or assist in
administering any aspect of the Medicaid program or the delivery of
Medicaid benefits or services;
(2) Establish a uniform format for reports and data submitted to the board and the
frequency, which may be monthly, quarterly, semiannually, annually, or
biannually, and the due date for the reports and data;
(3) Conduct public hearings in furtherance of its general duties, at which it may
request the appearance of officials of any state agency and solicit the testimony of
interested groups and the general public;
(4) Establish any advisory committees or subcommittees of the board that the board
deems necessary to carry out its duties;
(5) Recommend that the Auditor of Public Accounts to perform a financial or special
Page 6 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
audit of the Medicaid program or any aspect thereof; and
(6) Subject to selection and approval by the Legislative Research Commission, utilize
the services of consultants, analysts, actuaries, legal counsel, and auditors to
render professional, managerial, and technical assistance, as needed.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 7A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board, consistent with its purpose as established in Section 2 of this Act,
shall:
(a) On an ongoing basis, conduct an impartial review of all state laws and
regulations governing the Medicaid program and recommend to the
General Assembly any changes it finds desirable with respect to program
administration including delivery system models, program financing,
benefits and coverage policies, reimbursement rates, payment
methodologies, provider participation, or any other aspect of the program;
(b) On an ongoing basis, review of any change or proposed change in federal
laws and regulations governing the Medicaid program and report to the
Legislative Research Commission on the probable costs, possible budgetary
implications, potential effect on healthcare outcomes, and the overall
desirability of any change or proposed change in federal laws or regulations
governing the Medicaid program;
(c) At the request of the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the
President of the Senate, evaluate proposed changes to state laws affecting
the Medicaid program and report to the Speaker or the President on the
probable costs, possible budgetary implications, potential effect on
healthcare outcomes, and overall desirability as a matter of public policy;
(d) At the request of the Legislative Research Commission, research issues
related to the Medicaid program;
Page 7 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
(e) Beginning in 2026 and at least once every five (5) years thereafter, cause a
review to be made of the administrative expenses and operational cost of the
Medicaid program. The review shall include but not be limited to evaluating
the level and growth of administrative costs, the potential for legislative
changes to reduce administrative costs, and administrative changes the
department may make to reduce administrative costs or staffing needs. At
the discretion of the Legislative Research Commission, the review may be
conducted by a consultant retained by the board;
(f) Beginning in 2027 and at least once every five (5) years thereafter, cause a
program evaluation to be conducted of the Medicaid program. In any
instance in which a program evaluation indicates inadequate operating or
administrative system controls or procedures, inaccuracies, inefficiencies,
waste, extravagance, unauthorized or unintended activities, or other
deficiencies, the board shall report its findings to the Legislative Research
Commission. The program evaluation shall be performed by a consultant
retained by the board;
(g) Beginning in 2028 and at least once every five (5) years thereafter, cause an
actuarial analysis to be performed of the Medicaid program, to evaluate the
sufficiency and appropriateness of Medicaid reimbursement rates
established by the department and those paid by any managed care
organization contracted by the department for the delivery of Medicaid
services. The actuarial analysis shall be performed by an actuary retained
by the board;
(h) Beginning in 2029 and at least once every five (5) years thereafter, cause
the overall health of the Medicaid population to be assessed. The
assessment shall include but not be limited to a review of health outcomes,
healthcare disparities among program beneficiaries and as compared to the
Page 8 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
general population, and the effect of the overall health of the Medicaid
population on program expenses. The assessment shall be performed by a
consultant retained by the board; and
(i) Beginning in 2026 and annually thereafter, publish a report covering the
board's evaluations and recommendations with respect to the Medicaid
program. The report shall be submitted to the Legislative Research
Commission no later than December 1 of each year, and shall include at a
minimum a summary of the board's current evaluation of the program and
any legislative recommendations made by the board.
(2) The board, consistent with its purpose as established in Section 2 of this Act,
may:
(a) Review all new or amended administrative regulations related to the
Medicaid program and provide comments to the Administrative Regulation
Review Subcommittee established in KRS 13A.020;
(b) Make recommendations to the General Assembly, the Governor, the
secretary of the cabinet, and the commissioner of the department regarding
program administration including benefits and coverage policies, access to
services and provider network adequacy, healthcare outcomes and
disparities, reimbursement rates, payment methodologies, delivery system
models, funding, and administrative regulations. Recommendations made
pursuant to this section shall be nonbinding and shall not have the force of
law; and
(c) On or before December 1 of each calendar year, adopt an annual research
agenda. The annual research agenda may include studies, research, and
investigations considered by the board to be significant. Board staff shall
prepare a list of study and research topics related to the Medicaid program
for consideration by the board in the adoption of the annual research
Page 9 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
agenda. An annual research agenda adopted by the board may be amended
by the Legislative Research Commission to include any studies or reports
mandated by the General Assembly during the next succeeding regular
session.
(3) At the discretion of the Legislative Research Commission, studies and research
projects included in an annual research agenda adopted by the board pursuant to
subsection (2)(c) of this section may be conducted by outside consultants,
analysts, or researchers to ensure the timely completion of the research agenda.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 7A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Legislative Research Commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the
employment of personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 1 to 8 of this
Act. Staff and operating costs of the board shall be provided from the budget of the
Legislative Research Commission.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 7A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The officers and personnel of any state agency and any other person may serve at the
request of the board upon any advisory committees that the board may create. State
officers and personnel may serve upon these advisory committees without forfeiture of
office or employment and with no loss or diminution in the compensation statute,
rights, and privileges which they otherwise enjoy.
Section 9. KRS 7A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 7A.010 to 7A.170[this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires]:
(1) "Capital project" means:
(a) Any undertaking which is to be financed or funded through an appropriation
by the General Assembly of general fund, road fund, bond fund, trust and
agency fund, or federal fund moneys, where the expenditure is a capital
Page 10 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
expenditure pursuant to statute or under standards prescribed by the
Legislative Research Commission under the authority of KRS Chapter 48;
(b) Any undertaking which is to be financed by a capital expenditure for use by
the state government or one of its departments or agencies, as defined in KRS
12.010 or enumerated in KRS 12.020, including projects related to the
construction or maintenance of roads, and including projects of institutions of
higher education as defined in KRS 164A.550(2);
(c) Any capital construction item, or any combination of capital construction
items necessary to make a building or utility installation complete, estimated
to cost:
1. Except for items of movable equipment, one million dollars
($1,000,000) or more, regardless of the source of funds; or
2. Any item of movable equipment, estimated to cost two hundred
thousand dollars ($200,000) or more, regardless of the source of funds;
(d) Any lease of real property whose value is two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000) or more;
(e) Any lease of an item of movable equipment if the total cost of the lease, lease-
purchase, or lease with an option to purchase is two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000) or more; or
(f) Any new acquisition, upgrade, or replacement of an information technology
system estimated to cost one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more;
(2) "Board" means the Capital Planning Advisory Board of the Kentucky General
Assembly created by KRS 7A.110;
(3) "Plan" means the state capital improvement plan provided for by KRS 7A.120;
(4) "State agency" means any department, commission, council, board, bureau,
committee, institution, legislative body, agency, government corporation, or other
entity of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state government; and
Page 11 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
(5) "Information technology system" means any related computer or
telecommunications components that provide a functional system for a specific
business purpose and contain one (1) or more of the following:
(a) Hardware;
(b) Software, including application software, systems management software,
utility software, or communications software;
(c) Professional services for requirements analysis, system integration,
installation, implementation, or data conversion services; or
(d) Digital data products, including acquisition and quality control.
Section 10. KRS 7A.140 is amended to read as follows:
The board may adopt any administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A necessary to carry out its planning and advisory functions as provided by KRS
7A.010 to 7A.170[this chapter].
Section 11. KRS 7A.150 is amended to read as follows:
The Legislative Research Commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the
employment of personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS 7A.010 to
7A.170[Chapter 7A]. Staff and operating costs of the Capital Planning Advisory Board
shall be provided from the budget of the Legislative Research Commission.
Section 12. KRS 7A.180 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 7A.180 to 7A.190[this section]:
(1) "Board" means the Investments in Information Technology Improvement and
Modernization Projects Oversight Board;
(2) "Information technology system" means any related computer or
telecommunication components that provide a functional system for a specific
business purpose and contain one (1) or more of the following:
1. Hardware;
2. Software, including application software, systems management software,
Page 12 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 311
utility software, or communications software;
3. Professional services for requirements analysis, system integration,
installation, implementation, or data conversion services; or
4. Digital data products, including acquisition and quality control; and
(3) "State agency" means any department, commission, council, board, bureau,
committee, institution, legislative body, agency, government corporation, or other
entity of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state government.
Section 13. Whereas there is urgent need to establish legislative oversight of the
Kentucky Medical Assistance Program in order to ensure efficient program
administration and timely access to benefits and to provide members of the General
Assembly with the information and data necessary to make informed decisions about the
Kentucky Medical Assistance program, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 13 of 13
BR031100.100 - 311 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:15 PM Jacketed